Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 317 (2) 91 as/js/md H.F. 317 Section 1. Section 815.10, subsection 6, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 6. An attorney appointed under this section is not 3 liable to a person represented by the attorney for damages 4 as a result of a conviction in a criminal case unless the 5 court determines in a postconviction proceeding or on direct 6 appeal that the personâs conviction resulted from ineffective 7 assistance of counsel, and the ineffective assistance of 8 counsel is the proximate cause of the damage. In juvenile or 9 civil proceedings, an attorney appointed under this section 10 is not liable to a person represented by the attorney for 11 damages unless it has been determined that the attorney has 12 provided ineffective assistance of counsel, and the ineffective 13 assistance of counsel is the proximate cause of the damage. 14 Any attorney appointed under this section who is accused 15 of ineffective assistance of counsel shall be treated as 16 a state employee under chapter 669, including defense and 17 indemnification under section 669.21. 18 -1- HF 317 (2) 91 as/js/md 1/ 1